Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1047.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Community and Police Response Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Involved police department." A police department that employs an involved police officer."Involved police officer." A police officer that is being investigated for the use of deadly force."Police department." Any of the following:(1) A police department as defined in 53 Pa.C.S. § 2162 (relating to definitions).123456789101112131415161718 (2) The Pennsylvania State Police."Police officer." Any of the following:(1) A police officer as defined in 53 Pa.C.S. § 2162.(2) A member of the Pennsylvania State Police."Use of deadly force." An incident in which a police officer applied a use of force and a death occurred as a result."Use of force." As described in 18 Pa.C.S. § 508 (relating to use of force in law enforcement).Section 3. Application.This act applies to a use of deadly force by a police officer.Section 4. Full and independent investigation.(a) Selection of team.--The district attorney of the county in which a use of deadly force occurred shall assemble and lead a team, unrelated to the involved police department, of law enforcement personnel and experts to conduct a full and independent investigation into the use of deadly force by an involved police officer in accordance with this act. The district attorney may request that the Attorney General perform an investigation authorized under this act in accordance with section 205(a)(3) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(b) Prohibition.--Except as provided under subsection (c), once an involved police department transfers jurisdiction to the district attorney to investigate the involved police department, no member of the involved police department may participate in the independent investigation unless the following conditions apply:(1) Participation is requested by the district attorney.(2) Participation is in a limited capacity and only as 20250SB1047PN1234 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the district attorney deems necessary for the investigation.(c) Investigation of departmental directives.--An involved police department shall investigate an involved police officer for violations of departmental directives.(d) Powers and duties of district attorney.--(1) As part of the investigation under this section, the district attorney shall, without limitation:(i) Secure and take jurisdiction of the scene of the use of deadly force upon arrival as soon as possible.(ii) Gather and analyze evidence.(iii) Conduct witness interviews.(iv) Review and commission any necessary investigative or scientific reports.(v) Review audio and video recordings.(vi) Review photographs.(vii) Review physical evidence.(viii) Review geolocation and electronic evidence.(2) The district attorney shall maintain public trust in law enforcement by ensuring that the investigation under this section is conducted without actual bias or conflict of interest and without an appearance of bias or conflict of interest.(3) The district attorney shall exercise all other existing powers and duties of jurisdiction relative to any investigation of the involved police department over the scene of the use of deadly force.(4) The district attorney shall complete the investigation under this section within either of the following time frames:(i) Within 90 days of the use of deadly force.20250SB1047PN1234 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) If referred to an investigating grand jury, within 12 months of the referral or the end of the investigating grand jury's term, whichever is sooner.(5) Upon completion of the investigation under this section, the district attorney shall publish the findings of the investigation on the publicly accessible Internet website of the office of district attorney, subject to any exemptions from access under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, or 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91 (relating to criminal history record information).(e) Compliance.--The involved police department shall have a duty to comply with the requests of the district attorney related to the investigation under this section.Section 5. Referral and report.(a) Conflict of interest and discretion.--The district attorney conducting the investigation under section 4 shall avoid an actual or apparent conflict of interest when determining whether to file charges against an involved police officer and may either:(1) Prosecute the case through the district attorney's office.(2) Refer the case to an investigating grand jury under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 45 Subch. D (relating to investigating grand juries), if the case may only be brought before an investigating grand jury once.(3) Refer the case to the Attorney General, in which case the district attorney shall:(i) Notify the Attorney General of the referral in writing within seven days of the decision not to prosecute.20250SB1047PN1234 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Subject to subsection (b), publish a report on the publicly accessible Internet website of the office of district attorney within seven days of the decision not to prosecute, subject to any exemptions from access under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, or 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91 (relating to criminal history record information), which details the incident in which the use of deadly force was applied and provides the reasons that the district attorney declines to prosecute.(iii) Subject to subsection (c), refer the case and forward all available investigative materials to the Attorney General.(b) Report.--The report under subsection (a)(3)(ii) shall include, but not be limited to, the following:(1) Events leading up to the use of deadly force.(2) Why the use of force was applied.(3) Utilization of any deescalation techniques.(4) The behavior and speech of the victim before and during the use of deadly force.(5) The cause of death on the victim's death certificate and a medical examiner's report.(6) The behavior and speech by the involved police officer before, during and after the use of deadly force.(7) Details of the scene and the use of deadly force.(c) Investigative materials.--Upon referral to the Attorney General, the district attorney shall provide all investigative materials to the Attorney General, including:(1) Critical facts of the case.(2) All evidence gathered in the investigation.20250SB1047PN1234 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Any involvement or connections between the involved police officer and the district attorney.(4) The report under this section.Section 6. Public response.In accordance with 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings), the district attorney conducting the investigation under section 4, or the Attorney General in the event of referral under section 5, shall conduct a public meeting to share information and discuss the use of deadly force with the public no later than seven days after the use of deadly force occurs.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1047PN1234 - 6 - 12345678910111213